South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4091.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-2941(L)(2)(b) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (b) a person who is self-employed or to a person who is employed by a business owned in whole or in part by the person or a member of the person's household or immediate family unless during the defense of a criminal charge, the court finds that the vehicle's ownership by the business serves a legitimate business purpose and that titling and registration of the vehicle by the business was not done to circumvent the intent of this section; or SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----